Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.542

Antifreeze products—Aversive agents—Limitation of liability.

(1) A manufacturer, packager, distributor, recycler, or seller of an engine coolant or antifreeze that is required to contain an aversive agent as required by RCW 19.94.540 shall not be liable for any personal injury, death, property damage, damage to the environment or a natural resource, or economic loss that results from the inclusion of denatonium benzoate in engine coolant or antifreeze.

(2) The limitation of liability provided in subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a particular liability that is not caused or is unrelated to the inclusion of denatonium benzoate in engine coolant or antifreeze.

[ 2008 c 68 s 2.]